Washington statutes.
RCW 9A.76.027

Law enforcement or corrections officer engaged in criminal conduct.

RCW 9A.76.023 and 9A.76.025 do not apply when the law enforcement officer or corrections officer is engaged in criminal conduct.

[ 1998 c 252 s 3.]